Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
457

NURSES

Section

457-1 Purpose

457-1.5 Practice of nursing

457-2 Definitions

457-2.5 Registered nurse

457-2.6 Licensed practical nurse

457-2.7 Advanced practice registered nurse

457-3 State board of nursing; appointment; term
of office

457-4 Qualifications of board members

457-5 Duties and powers of board

457-5.5 Nursys; verification of nurse license

457-6 Repealed

457-6.5 Application of National Council of State
Boards of

Nursing Model Nursing Practice Act and
Model Nursing

Administrative Rules

457-7 Registered nurses; qualifications;
licenses; fees;

title; existing licensed nurses;
verification of

licenses; eligibility

457-7.5 Delegation

457-8 Licensed practical nurse; qualifications;
license;

fees; title; existing licensed nurses;
verification of

licenses; eligibility

457-8.5 Advanced practice registered nurse;
qualifications;

recognition; endorsement; fees;
eligibility

457-8.6 Prescriptive authority for advanced
practice

registered nurses

457-8.8 Advanced practice registered nurses;
global signature

authority

457-8.9 Advanced practice registered nurses;
expedited partner

therapy

457-9 Renewal of license; denial, suspension, or
revocation

of license for default of student loan,
student loan

repayment contract, or scholarship
contract;

inactivation and reactivation of
license; restoration

of forfeited license

457-9.2 Continuing competency requirements;
exemptions;

extensions; records retention; audit

457-9.3 Learning activity options

457-9.5 Center for nursing fee

457-10 Repealed

457-11 Nursing education programs

457-12 Discipline; grounds; proceedings; hearings

457-12.5 Discipline based on action taken in
another state;

conditions; prohibition on practice

457-13 Exceptions

457-14 Violations of chapter; penalties

457-15 Injunctive relief

457-16 Severability

457-17 Telehealth; privacy, security, and
confidentiality

Note

Source notes for certain sections of this chapter start with
L 1970, c 71, which completely amended this chapter.

Cross References

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Advanced practice registered nurses; filing of electronic
mail address, see §451D-5.

Diversion program for chemically dependent nurses, see
chapter 334D.

Health care professionals, see chapter 451D.

Immunity for prescribing, dispensing, or distributing opioid
antagonists, see chapter 329E.

Primary health care incentive program, see §321-1.5.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next